Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-1,131
Livestock auction market or packing plant; brand inspection; how
conducted; fees; guarantee.

Inspection provided
for in sections 54-1,129
to 54-1,131 shall be conducted in the manner established by the
Livestock Brand Act. The owner or operator making such election may be required
to guarantee to the Nebraska Brand Committee that inspection fees derived
from such livestock auction market or packing plant will be sufficient, in
each twelve-month period, to pay the per diem and mileage of the inspectors
required and that he or she will reimburse the committee for any deficit incurred
in any such twelve-month period. Such guarantee shall be secured by a corporate
surety bond, to be approved by the Secretary of State, in a penal sum to be
established by the Nebraska Brand Committee.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 30, p. 973;

Laws 1987, LB 450, § 11;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 77;

Laws 2000, LB 213, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 54-1185;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 4.